Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,201
Investment, defined.

Investment means the amount paid by the applicant for the project. The term includes any applicant resources received by the applicant for the project. The term does not include any matching funds received by the applicant under the Nebraska Rural Projects Act.

Laws 2021, LB40, § 7.